Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2358.8 of Title 68, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Catastrophe savings account” means a regular savings


account or money market account established by a taxpayer who is a


resident of this state, the exclusive purpose of which is to pay for


qualified catastrophe expenses;





Req. No. 2477 Page 1


2. “Catastrophic event” means a windstorm, a tornado, an


earthquake, an ice storm, a flood, a hailstorm, and any other


weather event that causes damage to homes;


3. “Qualified catastrophe expenses” means a qualified


deductible paid for damage resulting from a catastrophic event and


expenses incurred, that are not covered by an insurance policy, in


repairing damage or replacing a structure damaged by a catastrophic


event for the primary residence of the taxpayer; and


4. “Qualified deductible” means the amount of money the insured


shall pay before the insurance provider starts paying for the


covered damaged expenses for the insured’s primary residence caused


by a catastrophic event. If the policy provides for more than one


deductible, the deductible with the highest amount shall be the


qualified deductible.


B. A taxpayer may establish one catastrophe savings account


pursuant to this section which shall be labeled as a catastrophe


savings account and shall specify that the purpose of the account is


to cover qualified catastrophe expenses. No more than one


catastrophe savings account shall be established pursuant to this


section for a primary residence.


C. In order to claim the deduction allowed by this section:


1. For a taxpayer with a qualified deductible of One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) or less, the total amount that may be



Req. No. 2477 Page 2


contributed to a catastrophe savings account shall be Two Thousand


Dollars ($2,000.00) or less;


2. For a taxpayer with a qualified deductible greater than One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), the total amount that may be


contributed to a catastrophe savings account shall be the lesser of


twice the amount of the qualified deductible or Twenty-five Thousand


Dollars ($25,000.00); and


3. For a taxpayer with a self-insured primary residence or a


taxpayer who chooses not to obtain insurance on his or her primary


residence, the total amount that may be contributed to a catastrophe


savings account shall be Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars


($250,000.00) or less. Provided, the amount contributed shall not


exceed the market value of the primary residence, as reported by the


applicable county assessor.


D. 1. For tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, an


individual taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction from Oklahoma


adjusted gross income for amounts contributed to a catastrophe


savings account in compliance with this section.


2. For tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, interest or


returns earned by a catastrophe savings account in compliance with


this section shall be exempt from taxable income.


3. For tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, any distribution


from a catastrophe savings account in compliance with this section


that is used to cover qualified catastrophe expenses shall be exempt

Req. No. 2477 Page 3


from taxable income. Provided, if the aggregate distributions from


such account during the tax year exceed the qualified catastrophe


expenses of the taxpayer during the tax year, such excess


distributions shall be considered taxable income.


E. The Oklahoma Tax Commission may promulgate any rules


necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.




60-2-2477 QD 1/14/2026 8:57:37 PM































Req. No. 2477 Page 4